North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-28.1 Dentists’ Loan Repayment Program

43-28.1-01.
Loan repayment program — Dentists — Defined need — Maximum amount of funds.

Annually, the state health council shall select, from a pool of applicants, dentists who will provide dental services in cities or surrounding areas, or both, in this state which the state health council identifies as having a defined need for dental services. The dentists selected from this pool of applicants shall agree to accept medical assistance patients and assignments or provide dental services in a public health clinic, a practice with a focus on an underserved population, or a nonprofit dental clinic. A selected dentist who agrees to the terms of this program is eligible to receive funds for the repayment of the dentist’s education loans. The funds, which are payable over a five-year period, may not exceed one hundred thousand dollars per applicant. If the state health council accepts any gifts, grants, or donations under this chapter, the council may select additional dentists for participation in the loan repayment program under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 1; 2015, ch. 303, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 29, § 11, effective August 1, 2017.

43-28.1-01.1.
Loan repayment program for dentists in public health and nonprofit dental clinics. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 372, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 303, § 6, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 7 of chapter 303, S.L. 2015 provides, “

APPLICATION.

Sections 43-28.1-01.1,

43-28.1-02,

43-28.1-04, and

43-28.1-10 continue to apply to any dentists who received a grant under those sections before August 1, 2015.”

43-28.1-02.
Loan repayment program — Dentists — Powers of state health council. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 303, § 6, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 7 of chapter 303, S.L. 2015 provides, “

APPLICATION.

Sections 43-28.1-01.1,

43-28.1-02,

43-28.1-04, and

43-28.1-10 continue to apply to any dentists who received a grant under those sections before August 1, 2015.”

43-28.1-03.
Criteria.

The health council shall establish criteria to be used in selecting qualified dentists and in identifying cities or surrounding areas, or both, that have a defined need for dental services. The criteria must include consideration of:

The number of dentists already providing dental services in the city or surrounding areas, or both;

Access to dental services in the city and the surrounding areas;

How the dentist will provide dental services to individuals on medical assistance or in a public health clinic, a practice with a focus on an underserved population, or a nonprofit dental clinic; and

The dentist’s training in general dentistry or in a dental specialty and the extent to which such services are needed in the identified city or surrounding areas, or both.

As a term of receipt of funds under this chapter, a dentist shall accept medical assistance patients and assignments or provide dental services in a public health clinic, a practice with a focus on an underserved population, or a nonprofit dental clinic. For purposes of a dentist selected for loan payment under this chapter who practices within fifteen miles [24.14 kilometers] of the city limits of one of the three largest cities in the state, to qualify to receive a yearly disbursement under this chapter during that year of obligated service, the dentist must have:

Received dental medical payments of at least twenty thousand dollars in the form of medical assistance reimbursement; or

Practiced at least two full workdays per week at a public health clinic or at a nonprofit dental clinic that uses a sliding fee schedule to bill the nonprofit dental clinic’s patients.

The health council may consult with public and private sector entities in establishing criteria and evaluating needs based on the criteria.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 1; 2003, ch. 370, § 1; 2007, ch. 375, § 1; 2015, ch. 303, § 2, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 29, § 12, effective July 1, 2017.

43-28.1-04.
Community selection criteria. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 1; 2003, ch. 370, § 2; repealed by 2015, ch. 303, § 6, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 7 of chapter 303, S.L. 2015 provides, “

APPLICATION.

Sections 43-28.1-01.1,

43-28.1-02,

43-28.1-04, and

43-28.1-10 continue to apply to any dentists who received a grant under those sections before August 1, 2015.”

43-28.1-05.
Eligible loans.

The state health council may provide for loan repayment funds to a dentist who has received an education loan. The council may not provide funds for the repayment of any loan that is in default at the time of the application. The amount of repayment must be related to the dentist’s outstanding education loans. A dentist is eligible to receive loan repayment funds in an amount equal to the outstanding balance of the dentist’s education loans with applicable interest, or one hundred thousand dollars, whichever is less. Loan repayment funds may not be used to satisfy other service obligations under similar programs.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 1; 2015, ch. 303, § 3, effective August 1, 2015.

43-28.1-06.
Breach of loan repayment contract. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 292, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 292, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION

. In the case of a dental student loan repayment contract under chapter 43-28.1 which was entered before the effective date of this Act, the state health council and that dentist may amend the terms of the contract to comply with this Act.”

43-28.1-07.
Contract obligation.

The state health council shall enter a contract with a selected dentist. The contract must provide the state health council agrees to make payments of loan repayment funds to the selected dentist, subject to the dentist meeting the requirements and limitations established by the state health council under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 1; 2017, ch. 292, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 292, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION.

In the case of a dental student loan repayment contract under chapter 43-28.1 which was entered before the effective date of this Act, the state health council and that dentist may amend the terms of the contract to comply with this Act.”

43-28.1-08.
Payment
— Termination.

The state health council may not provide any loan repayment funds to a dentist under this chapter until the dentist has practiced at least six months on a full-time basis in the city or surrounding areas, or both, the state health council has identified as having a defined need for dental services.

Except as otherwise provided, the state health council shall make payments under this chapter at the conclusion of each of the five twelve-month periods of service during which the dentist met the qualifying terms of the contract. The state health council may make a prorated payment under this chapter if during the twelve-month period the dentist failed to meet the qualifying terms of the contract.

Payments under this chapter terminate upon the earlier of completion of five years as a participant in this loan repayment program or failure of the dentist to meet the qualifying terms under the contract.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 1; 2015, ch. 303, § 4, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 292, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 292, S.L. 2017 provides, “

APPLICATION.

In the case of a dental student loan repayment contract under chapter 43-28.1 which was entered before the effective date of this Act, the state health council and that dentist may amend the terms of the contract to comply with this Act.”

43-28.1-09.
Gifts, grants, and donations — Continuing appropriation.

The state health council may accept any conditional or unconditional gift, grant, or donation for the purpose of providing funds for the repayment of dentists’ educational loans. If any entity desires to provide funds to the council to allow an expansion of the program beyond the dentists contemplated by this chapter, the entity shall commit to fund fully the expansion for a period of five years. The council may contract with any public or private entity and may expend any moneys available to the council to obtain matching funds for the purposes of this chapter. All money received as gifts, grants, or donations under this section is appropriated as a continuing appropriation to the state health council for the purpose of providing funds for the repayment of additional dentists’ educational loans.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 385, § 1; 2015, ch. 303, § 5, effective August 1, 2015.

43-28.1-10.
New practices — Grants. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 375, § 2; 2011, ch. 319, § 1; repealed by 2015, ch. 303, § 6, effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 7 of chapter 303, S.L. 2015 provides, “

APPLICATION.

Sections 43-28.1-01.1,

43-28.1-02,

43-28.1-04, and

43-28.1-10 continue to apply to any dentists who received a grant under those sections before August 1, 2015.”